Hawaii statutes.
§802‑12 Organization of office;
assistance. Subject to the approval of the defender council, the state
public defender may employ assistant state public defenders and other
employees, including investigators, as may be necessary to discharge the
function of the office. Assistant state1 public defenders shall be
qualified to practice before the supreme court of this State. Assistant state
public defenders shall be appointed without regard to chapter 76 and shall
serve at the pleasure of the state public defender. All other employees may be
appointed in accordance with chapter 76. An assistant state public defender
may be employed on a part-time basis, and when so employed, the assistant
public defender may engage in the general practice of law, other than in the
practice of criminal law. [L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-12; ren L 1972, c
9, pt of §1 and am L 1972, c 44, §1(e); gen ch 1985; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am
L 2006, c 300, §16]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next